District of Columbia statutes.
48-904.04

Penalties under other laws.

Any penalty imposed for violation of this chapter is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 404, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-544.